Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.050

Reckless burning in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of reckless burning in the second degree if he or she knowingly causes a fire or explosion, whether on his or her own property or that of another, and thereby recklessly places a building or other structure, or any vehicle, railway car, aircraft, or watercraft, or any hay, grain, crop or timber, whether cut or standing, in danger of destruction or damage.

(2) Reckless burning in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 368; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.48.050.]